Nebraska, session 109, LB638.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB638 LB638
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 2-414, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
2-414 (1) The nitrogen reduction incentive program is created and
shall be administered by the Department of Natural Resources. The
department may collaborate with natural resources districts to administer
the program.
(2) The purposes of the program are to:
(a) Provide incentive payments to farmers; and
(b) Encourage farmers to (i) reduce the use of commercial fertilizer
and (ii) incorporate innovative technology into farming practices,
including the proper use of biological nitrogen products.
(3) The program shall provide an annual per-acre incentive for any
farmer who verifies through documentation that commercial fertilizer
rates were reduced by the lesser of forty pounds per acre for nitrogen or
fifteen percent by incorporating a qualifying product in the farmer's
nutrient plans.
(4) A commercial fertilizer rate reduction from historic baseline
use shall be completed to qualify for the program.
(5) The department shall review the required commercial fertilizer
rate of reduction for the program on a biennial basis to determine if
higher reduction targets are necessary.
(6) The department shall:
(a) Collaborate with natural resources districts to add any new
technology to the program as it becomes available. Such technology shall
replace nitrogen fertilizer use and maintain farm productivity;
(b) Identify geographically beneficial target areas while keeping
the program open to all farmers in the state;
(c) Consult with farmers and commercial entities in the agriculture
industry to determine a per-acre payment rate tied to the commercial
fertilizer rate reduction but not less than ten dollars per acre; and
(d) Review the per-acre payment rate based on inflation or emerging
-2-

LB638 LB638
2025 2025
technology in subsequent years.
(7)(a) The department shall not award an amount of incentive
payments in total per year under the nitrogen reduction incentive program
that is greater than the lesser of:
(i) Five million dollars; or
(ii) The amount appropriated for such purpose by the Legislature.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation from
the General Fund to carry out the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act be
used only for operating expenses.
Sec. 2. Section 2-416, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
2-416 (1) The Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund is created and
shall be administered by the Department of Natural Resources for purposes
of the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act. The Nitrogen Reduction Incentive
Cash Fund may consist of transfers as directed by the Legislature and
gifts, grants, bequests, and money from any public or private source.
(2)(a) Prior to the application deadline for fiscal year 2025-26,
the Department of Natural Resources shall apply for a grant of twenty-
five million dollars from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund, to be
paid out in five annual installments of five million dollars. The
purposes listed in the grant application shall be consistent with the
uses of the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund.
(b) If the application is granted, funds received from such grant
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nitrogen
Reduction Incentive Cash Fund for the purpose of supporting the projects
set forth in the grant application.
(3) The Department of Natural Resources shall establish a subaccount
within the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund for the accounting of
all money received as a grant from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund
as the result of an application made pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. At the end of each calendar month, the Department of Natural
-3-

LB638 LB638
2025 2025
Resources shall calculate the amount of interest earnings accruing to the
subaccount and shall notify the State Treasurer who shall then transfer a
like amount from the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Cash Fund to the
Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund.
(4) (2) The Department of Natural Resources may apply for all grants
from state, federal, and private sources that are applicable to the
purposes of the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act.
(5) (3) Any such grant applied for by the Department of Natural
Resources that is awarded to the Department of Natural Resources or the
State of Nebraska shall be credited to the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive
Cash Fund.
(6) (4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 3. Section 2-417, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
2-417 The Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act terminates on December
31, 2030 2029.
Sec. 4. Original sections 2-414, 2-416, and 2-417, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-